Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5648XC (5) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.45, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) A person who purchases a vehicle via 3 a remote sale in accordance with section 322.3, subsection 12. 4 Sec. 2. Section 321.67, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 1. No person, except Except as provided in sections 321.23 7 and 321.45 , section 321.52, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , and 8 section 321.52, subsection 4 , paragraph âaâ , and section 322.3, 9 subsection 12, a person shall not sell or otherwise dispose 10 of a registered vehicle or a vehicle subject to registration 11 without delivering to the purchaser or transferee thereof a 12 certificate of title with such assignment thereon as may be 13 necessary to show title in the purchaser. 14 Sec. 3. Section 322.3, subsection 12, unnumbered paragraph 15 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 A retail seller licensed under this chapter may engage in 17 remote sales of motor vehicles located at a place of business 18 of the retail seller , as listed on the license, under all of 19 the following conditions: 20 Sec. 4. Section 322.3, subsection 12, paragraphs a and c, 21 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 22 a. The dealer shall possess, at the time of the sale, the 23 certificate of title to any motor vehicle offered for remote 24 sale. The certificate of title may be in an electronic format 25 that is created, stored, and transferred only through a secure 26 electronic system approved by the department. 27 c. The dealer shall not sign a proposed purchase agreement 28 until the dealer receives an executed purchase agreement from 29 the buyer. A signed purchase agreement must be delivered to 30 the dealerâs place of business that is listed on the dealerâs 31 license . 32 Sec. 5. Section 322.3, subsection 12, Code 2026, is amended 33 by adding the following new paragraphs: 34 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. A person who purchases a motor vehicle 35 -1- LSB 5648XC (5) 91 th/ns 1/ 4 S.F. _____ via a remote sale shall acquire right to, claim to, and 1 interest in the motor vehicle at the time of delivery. The 2 seller must otherwise deliver the certificate of title pursuant 3 to section 321.45, but may do so within thirty days after 4 delivery of the motor vehicle. 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. The dealer shall disclose to a 6 prospective buyer all of the following regarding the vehicle 7 offered for sale: 8 (1) That the vehicle is not located in this state, if 9 applicable. 10 (2) Whether the dealer has a certificate of title to the 11 vehicle, including whether the certificate of title is in 12 an electronic format, if applicable, or whether the dealer 13 does not have the certificate of title to the vehicle, if 14 applicable. 15 (3) The estimated delivery date of the vehicle. 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. The dealer shall produce proof the 17 dealer has the certificate of title for a vehicle offered for 18 sale within twenty-four hours if requested by the department. 19 The dealer shall also retain records showing where a vehicle 20 is stored, the status of the vehicleâs title, and documents 21 relating to the remote sale of the vehicle. 22 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. A remote sale of a motor vehicle is not 23 a door-to-door sale as defined in section 555A.1, and is not 24 subject to chapter 555A. 25